Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,179
Nonresident vehicles; nonreciprocal jurisdiction; fees.

In case a jurisdiction is not reciprocal as to license fees on trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses, the owners of nonresident trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses from those jurisdictions shall pay the same license fees as are charged residents of this state. The owners of all trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses from other jurisdictions doing intrajurisdiction hauling in this state shall pay the same registration fees as those paid by residents of this state unless such trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses are registered as a part of a fleet in interjurisdiction commerce as provided in section 60-3,198.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 179.